District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

9-1219.25

Condemnation jury; appointment; oath; objection to jurors; hearing; verdict

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 715, 30 DCR 148

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 7-313 to 7-318.